Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-202 Acting for or aiding
unauthorized insurer prohibited. (a) No person shall directly or
indirectly act as producer for, or otherwise represent or aid on behalf of
another, any unauthorized insurer in the solicitation, negotiation,
procurement, or effectuation of insurance, or renewals thereof, or forwarding
of applications, or delivery of policies or contracts or inspection of risks,
or fixing of rates, or investigation or adjustment of claims or losses, or
collection or forwarding of premiums, or in any other manner represent or
assist an unauthorized insurer in the transaction of an insurance business.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) Transactions for which a certificate of authority
to do business is not required of an insurer under the insurance laws of this
State; and

(2) The property and operation of aircraft engaged in
interstate or foreign commerce. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 195,
§20; am L 2002, c 155, §14; am L 2006, c 154, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next